Utah statutes.
49-18-104.   Creation of trust fund.

(1)  There is created the "Judges' Noncontributory Retirement Trust Fund" for the purpose of paying the benefits and costs of administering this system.

(2)  The fund shall consist of all money, including interest, and assets transferred to it under any terminated system, the money paid into it under this system, whether in the form of cash, securities, or other assets, and of all money received from any other source.

(3)  Custody, management, and investment of the fund shall be governed by Chapter 11, Utah State Retirement Systems Administration.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

